Utah statutes.
13-22-6.   Application for registration.
(1)  An applicant for registration or renewal of registration as a charitable
organization shall:
(a)  pay an application fee as determined under Section 63J-1-504; and
(b)  submit an application on a form approved by the division which shall
include:
(i)  the organization's name, address, telephone number, facsimile number, if
any, and the names and addresses of any organizations or persons controlled
by, controlling, or affiliated with the applicant;
(ii)  the specific legal nature of the organization, that is, whether it is an
individual, joint venture, partnership, limited liability company,
corporation, association, or other entity;
(iii)  the names and residence addresses of the officers and directors of the
organization;
(iv)  the name and address of the registered agent for service of process and
a consent to service of process;
(v)  the purpose of the solicitation and use of the contributions to be
solicited;
(vi)  the method by which the solicitation will be conducted and the projected
length of time it is to be conducted;
(vii)  the anticipated expenses of the solicitation, including all
commissions, costs of collection, salaries, and any other items;
(viii)  a statement of what percentage of the contributions collected as a
result of the solicitation are projected to remain available for application
to the charitable purposes declared in the application, including a
satisfactory statement of the factual basis for the projected percentage;
(ix)  a statement of total contributions collected or received by the
organization within the calendar year immediately preceding the date of the
application, including a description of the expenditures made from or the use
made of the contributions;
(x)  a copy of any written agreements with any professional fund raiser
involved with the solicitation;
(xi)  disclosure of any injunction, judgment, or administrative order or
conviction of any crime involving moral turpitude with respect to any officer,
director, manager, operator, or principal of the organization;
(xii)  a copy of all agreements to which the applicant is, or proposes to be,
a party regarding the use of proceeds for the solicitation or fundraising;
(xiii)  a statement of whether or not the charity, or its parent foundation,
will be using the services of a professional fund raiser or of a professional
fund raising counsel or consultant;
(xiv)  if either the charity or its parent foundation will be using the
services of a professional fund raiser or a professional fund raising counsel
or consultant:
(A)  a copy of all agreements related to the services; and
(B)  an acknowledgment that fund raising in the state will not commence until
both the charitable organization, its parent foundation, if any, and the
professional fund raiser or professional fund raising counsel or consultant
are registered and in compliance with this chapter; and
(xv)  any additional information the division may require by rule.
(2)  If any information contained in the application for registration becomes
incorrect or incomplete, the applicant or registrant shall, within 30 days
after the information becomes incorrect or incomplete, correct the application
or file the complete information required by the division.
(3)  In addition to the registration fee, an organization failing to file a
registration application or renewal by the due date or filing an incomplete
registration application or renewal shall pay an additional fee of $25 for
each month or part of a month after the date on which the registration
application or renewal were due to be filed.
(4)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the registration fee for a certified
local museum under Section 9-6-603 is 65% of the registration fee established
under Subsection (1).
